Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1704
Parking authority; Governor; establish; when; proclamation; copy filed with Secretary of State; effect.

The Governor shall establish a parking authority whenever requested by the city council of a city of the metropolitan class in which the county seat is located. The authority shall be established by the Governor issuing a proclamation declaring the existence of such an authority and filing a copy of such proclamation with the Secretary of State. The authority shall be a body corporate and politic to be known as .............. Parking Authority, therein inserting the name of the city requesting the authority. Such an authority shall be a governmental subdivision of the State of Nebraska with the powers and authority provided by the Parking Authority Law. Such authority is declared to be an instrumentality of the state exercising public and essential governmental functions in the performance of the powers conferred upon it by the Parking Authority Law, and shall be deemed located in the county where the city requesting the establishment of the parking authority is located.

Laws 1955, c. 22, § 4, p. 103;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 288.
July 21, 2022